Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB272.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
3 Section 1. KRS 304.5-150 is amended to read as follows:
4 Complete copies of reinsurance treaties and contracts shall, at his or her request, be filed
5 with and approved by the commissioner.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/13/2026 11:38 AM Jacketed